Washington statutes.
RCW 18.210.180

Foreign jurisdiction—License without examination.

Any person holding a license issued by a jurisdiction outside the state of Washington authorizing that person to perform design services for site soil assessment, hydraulics, topographic delineations, use of specialized treatment processes and devices, microbiology, and construction practices of on-site wastewater treatment systems may be granted a license without examination under this chapter, if:

(1) The education, experience, and/or examination forming the basis of the license is determined by the board to be equal to or greater than the conditions for the issuance of a license under this chapter; and

(2) The individual has paid the applicable fee and has submitted the necessary application form.

[ 2011 c 256 s 11; 1999 c 263 s 19.]